incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
<pardef n="/VERBS__پالود">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>پالود</l><r>پالودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>پالوده</l><r>پالودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>پالا‍ان</l><r>پالودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>پالا‍ی</l><r>پالودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>پالا‍ی</l><r>پالودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>پالا‍ی</l><r>پالودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__هشت">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>هشت</l><r>هشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>هشته</l><r>هشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>هلان</l><r>هشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>هل</l><r>هشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>هل</l><r>هشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>هل</l><r>هشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__نیوشید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نیوشید</l><r>نیوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نیوشیده</l><r>نیوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نیوشان</l><r>نیوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نیوش</l><r>نیوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>نیوش</l><r>نیوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>نیوش</l><r>نیوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__نیوشاند">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نیوشاند</l><r>نیوشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نیوشانده</l><r>نیوشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نیوشانان</l><r>نیوشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نیوشان</l><r>نیوشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>نیوشان</l><r>نیوشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>نیوشان</l><r>نیوشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__نگریست">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نگریست</l><r>نگریستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نگریسته</l><r>نگریستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نگران</l><r>نگریستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نگر</l><r>نگریستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>نگر</l><r>نگریستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>نگر</l><r>نگریستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__نگارید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نگارید</l><r>نگاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نگاریده</l><r>نگاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نگاران</l><r>نگاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نگار</l><r>نگاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>نگار</l><r>نگاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>نگار</l><r>نگاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__نوشید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نوشید</l><r>نوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نوشیده</l><r>نوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نوشان</l><r>نوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نوش</l><r>نوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>نوش</l><r>نوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>نوش</l><r>نوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__نوشت">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نوشت</l><r>نوشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نوشته</l><r>نوشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نویسان</l><r>نوشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نویس</l><r>نوشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>نویس</l><r>نوشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>نویس</l><r>نوشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="پالودن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__پالود"/></e>
                            <e lm="نگاریدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__نگارید"/></e>
                            <e lm="نگریستن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__نگریست"/></e>
                            <e lm="نوشتن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__نوشت"/></e>
                            <e lm="نوشیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__نوشید"/></e>
                            <e lm="نیوشاندن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__نیوشاند"/></e>
                            <e lm="نیوشیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__نیوشید"/></e>
                            <e lm="هشتن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__هشت"/></e>
